Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska51-803
Intracounty public library federation; establishment; board; members; terms; expenses.

(1) Upon the request of two or more local governing authorities within a county, the county board may establish a public library federation.

(2) The county board shall appoint seven residents of the county to the public library federation board. At least four members of the public library federation board shall represent communities whose public libraries have affiliated with the federation. The members shall be appointed to broadly represent the county's population.

(3) Each member of the public library federation board shall serve a term of not less than three nor more than five years as determined by the county board, except that the terms of the initial appointments may vary in length so that terms will expire in a staggered fashion. If a vacancy exists, the unexpired term shall be filled by appointment by the county board.

(4) A member of the public library federation board shall not receive compensation for services rendered as a board member but may be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of official duties from the public library federation fund.

Laws 1999, LB 362, § 3.